Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2919
License or certificate required.

(1) No person may practice physical therapy, hold oneself out as a physical therapist or physiotherapist, or use the abbreviation PT in this state without being licensed by the department. No person may practice as a physical therapist assistant, hold oneself out as a physical therapist assistant, or use the abbreviation PTA in this state without being certified by the department.

(2) A physical therapist may use the title physical therapist or physiotherapist and the abbreviation PT in connection with his or her name or place of business. A physical therapist assistant may use the title physical therapist assistant and the abbreviation PTA in connection with his or her name.

(3) No person who offers or provides services to another or bills another for services shall characterize such services as physical therapy or physiotherapy unless such services are provided by a physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant acting under the general supervision of a physical therapist.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 137;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,381;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1012.